FST Assignment 2/sources/cat1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+Noun +Masculine +Nominative +Accusative +NominativeOrAccusative +Singular +Plural +Definite +Indefinite

LEXICON Root
	kakulu	Noun1;
	kuhuMu	Noun1;
	wadu	Noun1;
	qArA	Noun1;
	mavuru	Noun1;

LEXICON Noun1
	+Noun+Masculine:0	Noun2;
	
LEXICON Noun2
	+NominativeOrAccusative+Singular+Definite:wA	#;
	+Nominative+Singular+Indefinite:wek	#;
	+Nominative+Plural:wO			#;
	+Accusative+Plural:wan			#;
